Oklahoma, session 2025, HB1377.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 37A O.S. 2021, Section 6-103, as
last amended by Section 1, Chapter 200, O.S.L. 2023 (37A O.S. Supp.
2024, Section 6-103), is amended to read as follows:
Section 6-103. A. No retail spirits licensee shall:
HB1377 HFLR Page 1
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

1. Purchase or receive any alcoholic beverage other than from a
wine and spirits wholesaler, beer distributor, winery or small
brewer self-distribution licensee who elects to self-distribute;
2. Suffer or permit any retail container to be opened, or any
alcoholic beverage to be consumed on the licensed premises, except
when serving samples as authorized by Section 2-109 of this title or
otherwise permitted by law; provided, the licensee shall not permit
any alcoholic beverage content or retail container unsealed in
connection with sampling authorized by Section 2-109 of this title
to remain on the licensed premises at the close of business on that
day, excluding spirits;
3. Sell any alcoholic beverages at any hour other than between
the hours of 8:00 a.m. and midnight Monday through Saturday, and
shall not be permitted to be open on Thanksgiving Day or Christmas
Day; provided, a county may, pursuant to the provisions of
subsections B and C of Section 3-124 of this title, elect to allow
such sales between the hours of noon and midnight on Sunday. Retail
spirits licensees shall be permitted to sell alcoholic beverages on
the day of any General, Primary, Runoff Primary or Special Election
whether on a national, state, county or city election, provided that
the election day does not occur on any day on which such sales are
otherwise prohibited by law;


HB1377 HFLR Page 2
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

4. Sell spirits in a city or town, unless such city or town has
a population in excess of two hundred (200) according to the latest
Federal Decennial Census;
5. Sell any alcoholic beverage on credit; provided, that
acceptance by a licensee of a cash or debit card or a nationally
recognized credit card in lieu of actual cash payment does not
constitute the extension of credit; provided, further, as used in
this section:
a. "cash or debit card" means any instrument or device
whether known as a debit card or by any other name,
issued with or without fee by an issuer for the use of
the cardholder in depositing, obtaining or
transferring funds from a consumer banking electronic
facility, and
b. "nationally recognized credit card" means any
instrument or device, whether known as a credit card,
credit plate, charge plate or by any other name,
issued with or without fee by an issuer for the use of
the cardholder in obtaining money, goods, services or
anything else of value on credit which is accepted by
over one hundred retail locations;
6. Offer or furnish any prize, premium, gift or similar
inducement to a consumer in connection with the sale of alcoholic
beverages, except:
HB1377 HFLR Page 3
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

a. that goods or merchandise included by the manufacturer
in packaging with alcoholic beverages or for packaging
with alcoholic beverages shall not be included in this
prohibition, but no wholesaler or retailer shall sell
any alcoholic beverage prepackaged with other goods or
merchandise at a price which is greater than the price
at which the alcoholic beverage alone is sold;
provided, it shall not be considered inducement or a
premium for a retail spirits licensee to have an
advertised price posted higher online than the shelf
price on the licensed premises,
b. retail spirits licensee offering retail packages at a
discount from retail price for current or former
members of the United States Armed Forces, at the
discretion of the licensee; no discount shall make the
retail price lower than six-percent markup, as
applicable in Section 3-118 of this title; or
7. Pay for alcoholic beverages by a check or draft which is
dishonored by the drawee when presented to such drawee for payment;
and the ABLE Commission may cancel or suspend the license of any
retailer who has given a check or draft, as maker or endorser, which
is so dishonored upon presentation.
B. No retail spirits licensee shall permit any person under
twenty-one (21) years of age to enter into or remain within or about
HB1377 HFLR Page 4
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

the licensed premises unless accompanied by the person's parent or
legal guardian; provided, however, this restriction shall not apply
to an employee of a licensed beer distributor or wine and spirits
wholesaler who:
1. Is at least eighteen (18) years of age;
2. Is accompanied by a coworker at least twenty-one (21) years
of age; and
3. Enters for the sole purpose of merchandising or delivering
product to the licensee in the normal course of business.
SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 37A O.S. 2021, Section 6-108, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 6-108. No holder of a Retail Wine License or a Retail
Beer License shall:
1. Purchase or receive any alcoholic beverage other than from a
wine and spirits wholesaler, beer distributor, winery or small
brewer self-distribution licensee;
2. Suffer or permit any retail container to be opened, or any
alcoholic beverage to be consumed on the licensed premises, except
when serving samples as authorized by Section 2-109 of this title or
as otherwise permitted by law; provided, the licensee shall not
permit any alcoholic beverages content or retail container unsealed
in connection with sampling authorized by Section 2-109 of this
title to remain on the licensed premises at the close of the
business on that day;
HB1377 HFLR Page 5
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

3. Sell any beer or wine at any hour other than between the
hours of 6:00 a.m. and 2:00 a.m. the following day, Monday through
Sunday. Retail wine and retail beer licensees shall be permitted to
sell beer and wine on the day of any General, Primary, Runoff
Primary or Special Election whether on a national, state, county or
city election;
4. Sell any beer and wine on credit; except as follows:
a. the acceptance by a grocery store, convenience store
or drug store of a cash or debit card, or a nationally
recognized credit card, in lieu of actual cash payment
does not constitute the extension of credit; provided,
further, as used in this section:
(1) "cash or debit card" means any instrument or
device whether known as a debit card or by any
other name, issued with or without fee by an
issuer for the use of the cardholder in
depositing, obtaining or transferring funds from
a consumer banking electronic facility, and
(2) "nationally recognized credit card" means any
instrument or device, whether known as a credit
card, credit plate, charge plate or by any other
name, issued with or without fee by an issuer for
the use of the cardholder in obtaining money,
goods, services or anything else of value on
HB1377 HFLR Page 6
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

credit which is accepted by over one hundred
retail locations, and
b. when the holder of a Retail Wine License, Retail Beer
License or Mixed Beverage License is a private
membership club, marina, golf course or country club
that normally charges food, drinks and other purchases
to the member's monthly dues account in the regular
course of business, in lieu of actual cash payment at
the time of purchase, such practice does not
constitute the extension of credit;
5. Offer or furnish any prize, premium, gift or similar
inducement to a consumer in connection with the sale of beer or
wine, except that:
a. goods or merchandise included by the manufacturer in
packaging with beer or wine or for packaging with beer
or wine shall not be included in this prohibition, nor
shall a retail wine or retail beer license holder
selling wine or beer at a multiunit discount be
included in this prohibition; but no retail wine or
retail beer licensee shall sell any beer or wine
prepackaged with other goods or merchandise at a price
which is greater than the price at which the alcoholic
beverage alone is sold,

HB1377 HFLR Page 7
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

b. retail wine and retail beer licensees offering retail
packages at a discount from retail price for former
members of the United States Armed Forces, at the
discretion of the licensee; no discount shall make the
retail price lower than six-percent markup, as
applicable in Section 3-118 of this title; or
6. Pay for beer or wine by a check or draft which is dishonored
by the drawee when presented to such drawee for payment; and the
ABLE Commission may cancel or suspend the license of any retailer
who has given a check or draft, as maker or endorser, which is so
dishonored upon presentation.
SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES
OVERSIGHT, dated 02/26/2025 - DO PASS, As Coauthored.










HB1377 HFLR Page 8
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.